Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 07. Medical Assistance for Needy Persons.

Administrative Code. —

For Medicaid assistance eligibility, see 7 AAC 100. For Medicaid coverage and payment, see 7 AAC 105 — 7 AAC 160.

Sec. 47.07.010.
Purpose.

It is declared by the legislature as a matter of public concern that the needy persons of this state who are eligible for medical care at public expense under this chapter should seek only uniform and high quality care that is appropriate to their condition and cost-effective to the state and receive that care, regardless of race, age, national origin, or economic standing. It is equally a matter of public concern that providers of services under this chapter should operate honestly, responsibly, and in accordance with applicable laws and regulations in order to maintain the integrity and fiscal viability of the state’s medical assistance program, and that those who do not operate in this manner should be held accountable for their conduct. It is vital that the department administer this chapter in a manner that promotes effective, long-term cost containment of the state’s medical assistance expenditures while providing medical care to recipients. Accordingly, this chapter authorizes the department to apply for participation in the national medical assistance program as provided for under 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396p (Title XIX, Social Security Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 182 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 66 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For prospective payment system; other payment, see 7 AAC 43, art. 14.

For rural health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 22.

For federally qualified health centers, see 7 AAC 43, art. 23.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective September 9, 2003, rewrote the first sentence, added the second sentence, and in the last sentence substituted “department” for “Department of Health and Social Services.”

Sec. 47.07.020.
Eligible persons.

All residents of the state for whom the Social Security Act requires Medicaid coverage are eligible to receive medical assistance under 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396p (Title XIX, Social Security Act).

In addition to the persons specified in (a) of this section, the following optional groups of persons for whom the state may claim federal financial participation are eligible for medical assistance:

persons eligible for but not receiving assistance under any plan of the state approved under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383c (Title XVI, Social Security Act, Supplemental Security Income) or a federal program designated as the successor to the aid to families with dependent children program;

persons in a general hospital, skilled nursing facility, or intermediate care facility, who, if they left the facility, would be eligible for assistance under one of the federal programs specified in (1) of this subsection;

persons under 21 years of age who are under supervision of the department, for whom maintenance is being paid in whole or in part from public funds, and who are in foster homes or private child-care institutions;

aged, blind, or disabled persons, who, because they do not meet income and resources requirements, do not receive supplemental security income under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383c (Title XVI, Social Security Act), and who do not receive a mandatory state supplement, but who are eligible, or would be eligible if they were not in a skilled nursing facility or intermediate care facility to receive an optional state supplementary payment;

persons under 21 years of age who are in an institution designated as an intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and who are financially eligible as determined by the standards of the federal program designated as the successor to the aid to families with dependent children program;

persons in a medical or intermediate care facility whose income while in the facility does not exceed 300 percent of the supplemental security income benefit rate under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383c (Title XVI, Social Security Act) but who would not be eligible for an optional state supplementary payment if they left the hospital or other facility;

persons under 21 years of age who are receiving active treatment in a psychiatric hospital and who are financially eligible as determined by the standards of the federal program designated as the successor to the aid to families with dependent children program;

persons under 21 years of age and not covered under (a) of this section, who would be eligible for benefits under the federal program designated as the successor to the aid to families with dependent children program, except that they have the care and support of both their natural and adoptive parents;

pregnant women not covered under (a) of this section and who meet the income and resource requirements of the federal program designated as the successor to the aid to families with dependent children program;

persons under 21 years of age not covered under (a) of this section who the department has determined cannot be placed for adoption without medical assistance because of a special need for medical or rehabilitative care and who the department has determined are hard-to-place children eligible for subsidy under AS

25.23.190

—

25.23.210

;

persons who can be considered under 42 U.S.C. 1396a(e)(3) (Title XIX, Social Security Act, Medical Assistance) to be individuals with respect to whom a supplemental security income is being paid under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383c (Title XVI, Social Security Act) because they meet all of the following criteria:

they are 18 years of age or younger and qualify as disabled individuals under 42 U.S.C. 1382c(a) (Title XVI, Social Security Act);

the department has determined that

they require a level of care provided in a hospital, nursing facility, or intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

it is appropriate to provide their care outside of an institution; and

the estimated amount that would be spent for medical assistance for their individual care outside an institution is not greater than the estimated amount that would otherwise be expended individually for medical assistance within an appropriate institution;

if they were in a medical institution, they would be eligible for medical assistance under other provisions of this chapter; and

home and community-based services under a waiver approved by the federal government are either not available to them under this chapter or would be inappropriate for them;

disabled persons, as described in 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XIII), who are in families whose income, as determined under applicable federal regulations or guidelines, is less than 250 percent of the official poverty line applicable to a family of that size according to the United States Department of Health and Human Services, and who, but for earnings in excess of the limit established under 42 U.S.C. 1396d(q)(2)(B), would be considered to be individuals with respect to whom a supplemental security income is being paid under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383c; a person eligible for assistance under this paragraph who is not eligible under another provision of this section shall pay a premium or other cost-sharing charges according to a sliding fee scale that is based on income as established by the department in regulations;

persons under 19 years of age who are not covered under (a) of this section and whose household income does not exceed 175 percent of the federal poverty line as defined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and revised under 42 U.S.C. 9902(2);

pregnant women who are not covered under (a) of this section and whose household income does not exceed 175 percent of the federal poverty line as defined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and revised under 42 U.S.C. 9902(2);

persons who have been diagnosed with breast or cervical cancer and who are eligible for coverage under 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XVIII).

Receipt of medical assistance under this chapter is considered to be an additional benefit to these individuals and does not affect other assistance payments, federal or state, for which the recipient is eligible.

Additional groups may not be added unless approved by the legislature.

Notwithstanding (b)(4) of this section, a person is not eligible for Medicaid benefits until a final determination is made on the eligibility of that person for benefits under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383c (Title XVI, Social Security Act).

A person may not be denied eligibility for medical assistance under this chapter on the basis of a diversion of income or transfer of assets, whether by assignment or after receipt of the income, into a Medicaid-qualifying trust or annuity that, according to a determination made by the department,

has provisions that require that the state will receive all of the trust or annuity assets remaining at the death of the individual, subject to a maximum amount that equals the total medical assistance paid on behalf of the individual; and

otherwise meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 1396p(d)(4) for a trust and 42 U.S.C. 1396p(c)(1)(F) and 42 U.S.C. 1396p(e)(1) for an annuity.

A person’s eligibility for medical assistance under this chapter may not be denied or delayed on the basis of a transfer of assets for less than fair market value if the person establishes to the satisfaction of the department that the denial or delay would work an undue hardship on the person as determined on the basis of criteria in applicable federal regulations.

A person who meets the eligibility requirements of (a) or (b) of this section, except that the person is a qualified alien as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1641, is eligible for medical assistance unless the person is not eligible under the limited eligibility provision of 8 U.S.C. 1613.

The department may allow a person under 19 years of age who is determined to be eligible for benefits under this chapter to remain eligible for those benefits for up to 11 calendar months following the month that the person is determined eligible for benefits or until the person is 19 years old, whichever occurs earlier.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 39 SLA 2008.]

[Repealed, § 1 ch 39 SLA 2008.]

Notwithstanding the eligibility provisions under (a) and (b) of this section, a person may not receive medical assistance under this section unless the person first enrolls in the Medicare program under 42 U.S.C. 1395 to the extent that the person is eligible to receive benefits and services under the program.

Except as provided in (g) of this section, the department shall impose a penalty period of ineligibility for the transfer of an asset for less than fair market value by an applicant or an applicant’s spouse consistent with 42 U.S.C. 1396p(c)(1).

[Repealed, § 1 ch 39 SLA 2008.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 182 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 117 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 221 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 132 SLA 1982; am § 13 ch 138 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 105 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 1988; am § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1993; am § 17 ch 102 SLA 1994; am §§ 38 — 42 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 130 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 140 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 2003; am § 85 ch 56 SLA 2005; am §§ 6, 7 ch 96 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 2010; am § 15 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (j), (k), and (n) were repealed by § 1, ch. 39, SLA 2008 before they took effect.

Cross references. —

For exclusion of certain funds from income calculation of certain long-term care facility residents, see AS

47.45.400

.

For federal poverty guidelines, see https://aspe.hhs.gov/poverty-guidelines.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For hospital services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 5.

For common medicaid eligibility requirements, see 7 AAC 100, art. 1.

For family medicaid, see 7 AAC 100, art. 2.

For transitional medicaid and extended medicaid, see 7 AAC 100, art. 3.

For under-21 medicaid, see 7 AAC 100, art. 4.

For medicaid for title IV-E adoption and foster care assistance recipients, see 7 AAC 100, art. 5.

For Denali kidcare: pregnant women and newborns, see 7 AAC 100, art. 6.

For Denali kidcare: poverty-level children, see 7 AAC 100, art. 7.

For medicaid eligibility for the aged and disabled, see 7 AAC 100, art. 8.

For long-term care medicaid eligibility, see 7 AAC 100, art. 9.

For long-term care medicaid post eligibility and cost of care, see 7 AAC 100, art. 10.

For medicaid treatment of trusts, see 7 AAC 100, art. 11.

For specialized medicaid eligibility categories, see 7 AAC 100, art. 12.

For medicare premium assistance categories, see 7 AAC 100, art. 13.

For recipient rights and responsibilities, and program integrity, see 7 AAC 100, art. 14.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the addition of subsection (h) by § 1,
ch. 82, SLA 1997 (CSHB 153 (FIN)), see 1997 House Journal 442. For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the addition of paragraphs (b)(13) and (14) and subsection (i) by
ch. 140, SLA 1998 (CSHB 369(FIN)am), see 1998 House Journal 2159.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 34, SLA 2003 (SB 105), which amended (d) and added former subsection (f), see 2003 Senate Journal 389 — 390.

Sec. 47.07.025.
Assignment of medical support rights.

An applicant for or recipient of assistance under this chapter is considered to have assigned to the state, through the department and the child support services agency, all rights to accrued and continuing medical support that the applicant and other persons for whom assistance is sought may have from all sources. The assignment takes effect upon a determination that the applicant is eligible for assistance under this chapter. Except with respect to the amount of any unpaid medical support obligation accrued under the assignment, the assignment under this section terminates when the applicant ceases to receive assistance under this chapter.

Through the child support services agency or on its own behalf, the department may garnish the wages, salary, or other employment income of a person who

is required by a medical support order, cash medical support order, or both, under AS

25.27.060(c)

to provide insurance or cash coverage of the costs of medical care to a child who is eligible for medical assistance under this chapter;

has received payment from a third party for the costs of the services; and

has not used the payments to reimburse, as appropriate, the other parent or custodian of the child, the provider of the services, or the department.

Garnishment under (b) of this section is limited to the amount necessary to reimburse the department for expenditures for the child under this chapter. Claims for current support or support arrearages take priority over claims under this section.

History.

(§ 18 ch 102 SLA 1994; am § 22 ch 106 SLA 2000; am § 11 ch 45 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (a) and (b) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For legislative purposes in enacting this section, see § 1, ch. 102, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For common medicaid eligibility requirements, see 7 AAC 100, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, in (b)(1), added “, cash medical support order, or both,” following “medical support order”, and “insurance or cash” following “under AS

25.27.060(c)

to provide”.

Sec. 47.07.030.
Medical services to be provided.

The department shall offer all mandatory services required under 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396p (Title XIX of the Social Security Act).

In addition to the mandatory services specified in (a) of this section and the services provided under (d) of this section, the department may offer only the following optional services: case management services for traumatic or acquired brain injury; case management and nutrition services for pregnant women; personal care services in a recipient’s home; emergency hospital services; long-term care noninstitutional services; medical supplies and equipment; advanced practice registered nurse services; clinic services; rehabilitative services for children eligible for services under AS

47.07.063

, substance abusers, and emotionally disturbed or chronically mentally ill adults; targeted case management services; inpatient psychiatric facility services for individuals 65 years of age or older and individuals under 21 years of age; psychologists’ services; clinical social workers’ services; marital and family therapy services; professional counseling services; midwife services; prescribed drugs; physical therapy; occupational therapy; chiropractic services; low- dose mammography screening, as defined in AS

21.42.375(e)

; hospice care; treatment of speech, hearing, and language disorders; adult dental services; prosthetic devices and eyeglasses; optometrists’ services; intermediate care facility services, including intermediate care facility services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities; skilled nursing facility services for individuals under 21 years of age; and reasonable transportation to and from the point of medical care.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the department may offer a service for which the department has received a waiver from the federal government if the department was authorized, directed, or requested to apply for the waiver by law or by a concurrent or joint resolution of the legislature.

The department shall establish as optional services a primary care case management system or a managed care organization contract in which certain eligible individuals are required to enroll and seek approval from a case manager or the managed care organization before receiving certain services. The purpose of a primary care case management system or managed care organization contract is to increase the use of appropriate primary and preventive care by medical assistance recipients while decreasing the unnecessary use of specialty care and hospital emergency department services. The department shall

establish enrollment criteria and determine eligibility for services consistent with federal and state law; the department shall require recipients with multiple hospitalizations to enroll in a primary care case management system or with a managed care organization under this subsection, except that the department may exempt recipients with chronic, acute, or terminal medical conditions from the requirement under this paragraph;

define the coordinated care services and the provider types eligible to participate as primary care providers;

create a performance and quality reporting system; and

integrate the coordinated care demonstration projects described under AS

47.07.039

and the demonstration projects described under AS

47.07.036(e)

with the primary care case management system or managed care organization contract established under this subsection.

The department shall provide the services set out in (a) and (b) of this section to an eligible person, notwithstanding the person’s participation in an approved clinical trial. In this subsection, “approved clinical trial” has the meaning given in AS

21.42.415

.

When the department authorizes the purchase of durable medical equipment under this section, the department may require a recipient of medical assistance services to purchase used or refurbished durable medical equipment if used or refurbished durable medical equipment

is available;

is less expensive, including shipping, than new durable medical equipment of the same type;

is able to withstand at least three years of use; and

equally meets the needs of the recipient.

For purposes of medical assistance coverage, the department may require behavioral health clinic services to be provided by or under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under AS 08.64. In this subsection, “direct supervision” means that a physician licensed under AS 08.64 is available, either in person or by a communication device, to

provide clinical consultation or oversight to the supervisee;

approve behavioral health treatment plans;

review each case to determine the need for continued care;

ensure that the services provided to recipients of behavioral health clinic services are medically necessary and clinically appropriate; and

assume professional responsibility for the services provided.

In this section,

“case management services for traumatic or acquired brain injury” means services furnished to assist individuals who reside in a community setting or who are transitioning to a community setting to gain access to needed medical, social, educational, and other available services;

“durable medical equipment” means equipment that

can withstand repeated use;

is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;

generally is not useful to an individual in the absence of an illness or injury; and

is appropriate for use in the home, school, or community.

“traumatic or acquired brain injury” has the meaning given in AS

47.80.529

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 182 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 1973; am § 2 ch 105 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 221 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1978; am § 25 ch 40 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 132 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 105 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 119 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 45 SLA 1989; am § 3 ch 69 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 110 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 51 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 76 SLA 1993; am § 19 ch 102 SLA 1994; am § 108 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 3, 4 ch 140 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 130 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 106 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 2004; am §§ 2, 3 ch 109 SLA 2010; am § 3 ch 117 SLA 2010; am § 16 ch 42 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2015; am § 44 ch 25 SLA 2016; am § 48 ch 33 SLA 2016; am § 7 ch 75 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 2020)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 2010, 2015, and 2018, to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes; subsection (h) was enacted as (e) in 2010; subsection (f) was enacted as (g) in 2015; paragraph (h)(2) was enacted as AS

47.07.900

(20) in 2015; and subsection (g) was enacted as (h) in 2018.

Section 4, ch. 18, SLA 2020, required the commissioner of health and social services to “notify the revisor of statutes in writing, on or before October 1, 2021, if the United States Department of Health and Human Services approves the amendments to the state plan for medical assistance coverage under AS

47.07.030(b)

” as amended by sec. 1, ch. 18, SLA 2020. The commissioner of health and social services notified the revisor of statutes on June 1, 2022, that the amendments of the state plan had been approved. Although this notification came after October 1, 2021, the amendments to the state plan were approved on September 20, 2021, so the revisor of statutes gave effect to the change with an effective date of October 2, 2021.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring a report to the legislature on “the effectiveness and cost-effectiveness of the coverage of marital and family therapy services”, see sec. 9, ch. 75, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a temporary provision relating to expending money for abortions that are not mandatory during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency, see sec. 12, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For public assistance, see 7 AAC 37.

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For physician services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 2.

For hospital services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 5.

For children’s services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 6.

For mental health services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 7.

For authorization of mental health rehabilitation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 8.

For medical transportation and accommodation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 9.

For inpatient psychiatric services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 10.

For prescribed drugs and medical supplies, see 7 AAC 43, art. 11.

For dental services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 12.

For visual care services and dispensing, see 7 AAC 43, art. 13.

For prospective payment system; other payment, see 7 AAC 43, art. 14.

For mental health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 15.

For rates for mental health services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 16.

For mental health rehabilitation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 17.

For substance abuse rehabilitative services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 18.

For consumer-directed and agency-based personal care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 19.

For home health care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 20.

For family planning services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 21.

For rural health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 22.

For federally qualified health centers, see 7 AAC 43, art. 23.

For chiropractic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 25.

For other services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 26.

For program participation — administrative remedies and sanctions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 27.

For home and community-based waiver services; nursing facility and ICF/MR level of care, see 7 AAC 43, art. 28.

For home and community-based waiver services; residential psychiatric treatment center level of care, see 7 AAC 43, art. 29.

For telemedicine applications, see 7 AAC 43, art. 30.

For audit and appeal, see 7 AAC 43, art. 31.

For recovery of medicaid expenditures from recipients, see 7 AAC 43, art. 32.

For durable medical equipment and medical supplies; related services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 33.

For definitions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 34.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

For common medicaid eligibility requirements, see 7 AAC 100, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective September 14, 2003, deleted the last two sentences in subsection (c), relating to the department annually making available to the legislature its recommendations.

The 2004 amendment, effective June 26, 2004, deleted “for substance abusers, chronically mentally ill adults, and severely emotionally disturbed persons under the age of 21” following “targeted case management services” in subsection (b).

The first 2010 amendment, effective September 23, 2010, inserted “case management services for traumatic or acquired brain injury;” in subsection (b); and added subsection (e) (now (f)).

The second 2010 amendment, effective September 29, 2010, added subsection (e).

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (b), substituted “individuals 65 years of age or older and individuals under 21 years of age” for “individuals age 65 or older and individuals under age 21”; substituted “persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities” for “the mentally retarded”; substituted “under 21 years of age” for “age 21” near the end.

The 2015 amendment, effective May 20, 2015, added (g) [now (f)].

The first 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, rewrote (d).

The second 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (b), substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner”.

The first 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (b), inserted “marital and family therapy services;” following “clinical social workers’ services;”.

The second 2018 amendment, effective November 27, 2018, added (h) [now (g)].

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter concerning the amendment of subsections (b) and (d) by
ch. 140, SLA 1998 (CSHB 369(FIN)am), see 1998 House Journal 2159.

Sec. 47.07.032.
Inpatient psychiatric services for persons under 21 years of age.

Notwithstanding AS

47.07.030

, the department may not grant assistance under this chapter for inpatient psychiatric services to a person under 21 years of age who is in an out-of-state psychiatric hospital facility or an out-of-state residential psychiatric treatment center unless the department determines that the assistance is for

psychiatric hospital services that are consistent with the person’s clinical diagnosis and appropriately address the person’s needs and that these services are unavailable in the state; or

residential psychiatric treatment center services that are consistent with the person’s clinical diagnosis and appropriately address the person’s needs and that these services are unavailable in the state.

The department shall, on a monthly basis, evaluate what types of services are available in the state for inpatient psychiatric care for persons under 21 years of age. If inpatient psychiatric services that are consistent with the person’s clinical diagnosis and that appropriately address the person’s needs become available at a location in the state for a person under 21 years of age who is receiving the services under this chapter at a location outside the state, the department shall, as a condition of continued eligibility for coverage of the services under this chapter, require the person to be transferred to the in-state facility unless the department determines that the transfer would be detrimental to the person’s health, established therapeutic relationship, or clinical need.

History.

(§ 1 ch 137 SLA 2003)

Sec. 47.07.035.
Priority of medical assistance. [Repealed, § 4 ch 106 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 47.07.036.
Cost containment measures authorized.

If the department finds that the costs of medical assistance for all persons eligible under this chapter will exceed the amount allocated in the state budget for a fiscal year, the department may implement cost containment measures to reduce anticipated program costs for that fiscal year as authorized under this section.

The department, in implementing this section, shall take all reasonable steps to implement cost containment measures that do not eliminate program eligibility or the scope of services required or authorized under AS

47.07.020

and

47.07.030

before implementing cost containment measures under (c) of this section that directly affect program eligibility or coverage of services. The cost containment measures taken under this subsection may include new utilization review procedures, changes in provider payment rates, precertification requirements for coverage of services, and agreements with federal officials under which the federal government will assume responsibility for coverage of some individuals or some services for some individuals through such federal programs as the Indian Health Service or Medicare.

If cost containment measures authorized under (b) of this section are insufficient to reduce the anticipated program costs for a fiscal year to the amount allocated in the state budget for the program for that fiscal year, the department may, to the extent authorized under federal law and the state’s constitution, deny any or all optional services listed in AS

47.07.030(b)

— (d) to a person eligible for services under AS

47.07.020

or deny program eligibility to a person who is eligible for the medical assistance program under the optional coverage provisions of AS

47.07.020(b)

— (i). However, the department may not eliminate program participation of a person who is eligible for coverage under AS

47.07.020(a)

, nor may the department deny coverage of a service described in AS

47.07.030(a)

for a person who is eligible for the medical assistance program under AS

47.07.020

.

Notwithstanding (a) — (c) of this section, the department may

apply for a section 1915(i) option under 42 U.S.C. 1396n to improve services and care through home and community-based services to obtain, at a minimum, a 50 percent federal match;

apply for a section 1915(k) option under 42 U.S.C. 1396n to provide home and community-based services and support to increase the federal match for these programs from 50 percent to 56 percent;

apply for a section 1945 option under 42 U.S.C. 1396w-4 to provide coordinated care through health homes for individuals with chronic conditions and to increase the federal match for the services to 90 percent for the first eight quarters the required state plan amendment is in effect;

evaluate and seek permission from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, to participate in various demonstration projects, including payment reform, care management programs, workforce development and innovation, and innovative services delivery models; and

provide incentives for telehealth, including increasing the capability for and reimbursement of telehealth for recipients.

Notwithstanding (a) — (c) of this section, and in addition to the projects and services described under (d) and (f) of this section, the department shall apply for a section 1115 waiver under 42 U.S.C. 1315(a) to establish one or more demonstration projects focused on innovative payment models for one or more groups of medical assistance recipients in one or more specific geographic areas. The demonstration project or projects may include

managed care organizations as described under 42 U.S.C. 1396u-2;

community care organizations;

patient-centered medical homes as described under 42 U.S.C. 256a-1; or

other innovative payment models that ensure access to health care without reducing the quality of care.

Notwithstanding (a) — (c) of this section, and in addition to the projects and services described under (d) and (e) of this section, the department shall apply for a section 1115 waiver under 42 U.S.C. 1315(a) to establish one or more demonstration projects focused on improving the state’s behavioral health system for medical assistance recipients. The department shall engage stakeholders and the community in the development of a project or projects under this subsection. The demonstration project or projects must

be consistent with the comprehensive and integrated behavioral health program described under AS

47.05.270(b)

; and

include continuing cooperation with the grant-funded community mental health clinics and drug and alcohol treatment centers that have historically provided care to recipients of behavioral health services.

In this section, “telehealth” has the meaning given in AS

47.05.270(e)

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 106 SLA 2003; am § 45 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to ch. 106, SLA 2003, which added this section, see § 1, ch. 106, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, added (d) — (g).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5, ch. 106, SLA 2003, provides that this section “applies only to eligibility determinations made and medical services performed on or after July 1, 2003.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 106, SLA 2003 (Senate Bill 109), adding this section, see 2003 Senate Journal 395.

Sec. 47.07.038.
Collaborative, hospital-based project to reduce use of emergency department services.

History.

[Repealed, § 61[d] ch 25 SLA 2016.]

Revisor's note.—

This section was enacted conditionally under secs. 46 and 61(d),
ch. 25,
SLA 2016. The condition was never satisfied and therefore the section never took effect. As this section was included in the statutes in anticipation of the conditional effect being satisfied, the revisor of statutes has chosen to treat the failure of the condition as a repeal to ensure that the statutory record is accurately reflected and preserved.